Oklahoma, session 2026, SB542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 307, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 307. Each agency shall provide by rule for the filing


and prompt disposition of petitions for declaratory rulings as to


the applicability of any rule or order of the agency. Each agency


shall issue or refuse to issue a declaratory ruling within one


hundred twenty (120) calendar days from the date the request for


declaratory ruling was submitted to the agency. A declaratory

Req. No. 117 Page 1


ruling, or refusal to issue such ruling, shall be subject to a


judicial review in the manner provided for review of decisions in


individual proceedings as provided in Sections 317 through 323 of


this title.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 309, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 309. A. In an individual proceeding, all parties shall


be afforded an opportunity for hearing after reasonable notice, and


all parties shall be provided with a copy of the notice given to


other parties.


B. The notice shall include:


1. A statement of the time, place and nature of the hearing;


2. A statement of the legal authority and jurisdiction under


which the hearing is to be held;


3. A reference to the particular sections of the statutes and


rules involved; and


4. A short and plain statement of the matters asserted. If the


agency or other party is unable to state the matters in detail at


the time the notice is served, the initial notice may be limited to


a statement of the issues involved. Thereafter upon application a


more definite and detailed statement shall be furnished.


C. Opportunity shall be afforded all parties to respond and


present evidence and argument on all issues involved.



Req. No. 117 Page 2


D. Deliberations by administrative heads, hearing examiners,


and other persons authorized by law may be held in executive session


pursuant to paragraph 8 of subsection B of Section 307 of Title 25


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


E. Unless precluded by law, informal disposition may be made of


any individual proceeding by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent


order, or default.


F. The record in an individual proceeding shall include:


1. All pleadings, motions, and intermediate rulings;


2. Evidence received or considered at the individual


proceeding;


3. A statement of matters officially noticed;


4. Questions and offers of proof, objections, and rulings


thereon;


5. Proposed findings and exceptions;


6. Any decision, opinion, or report by the officer presiding at


the hearing; and


7. All other evidence or data submitted to the hearing examiner


or administrative head in connection with their the consideration of


the case, provided all parties have had access to such evidence.


G. Oral proceedings shall be electronically recorded. Such


recordings shall be maintained for such time so as to protect the


record through judicial review. Copies of the recordings shall be


provided by the agency at the request of any party to the

Req. No. 117 Page 3


proceeding. Costs of transcription of the recordings shall be borne


by the party requesting the transcription. For judicial review,


electronic recordings of an individual proceeding, as certified by


the agency, may be submitted to the reviewing court by the agency as


part of the record of the proceedings under review without


transcription unless otherwise required to be transcribed by the


reviewing court. In such case, the expense of transcriptions shall


be taxed and assessed against the nonprevailing party. Parties to


any proceeding may have the proceedings transcribed by a court


reporter at their own expense.


H. Findings of fact shall be based exclusively on the evidence


received and on matters officially noticed in the individual


proceeding unless otherwise agreed upon by the parties on the


record.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 316, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 316. A hearing examiner or agency member shall withdraw


from any individual proceeding in which he or she cannot accord a


fair and impartial hearing or consideration. Any party may request


the disqualification of a hearing examiner or agency member, on the


ground of his inability to give a fair and impartial hearing,


improper appointment to the agency, or failure to take the


constitutional oath of office and file with the Secretary of State,


by filing an affidavit, promptly upon discovery of the alleged

Req. No. 117 Page 4


disqualification, stating with particularity the grounds upon which


it is claimed that a fair and impartial hearing cannot be accorded.


The issue shall be determined promptly by the administrative head of


the agency, or, if it affects a member or members of the agency, by


the remaining members thereof, if the number of remaining members


constitutes a quorum. Upon the entry of an order of


disqualification affecting a hearing examiner, the agency shall


assign another in his stead hearing examiner or shall conduct the


hearing itself. Upon the disqualification of a member of an agency,


the agency shall proceed with the proceeding if a quorum remains.


If a quorum no longer exists, by virtue because of the member’s


disqualification, the Governor immediately shall appoint a member


pro tempore to sit in place of the disqualified member in that the


proceeding. In further action, after the disqualification of a


member of an agency, the provisions of Section 311 of this title


shall apply.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 318, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 318. A. 1. Any party aggrieved by a final agency


order in an individual proceeding is entitled to certain, speedy,


adequate and complete judicial review thereof pursuant to the


provisions of this section and Sections 319, 320, 321, 322 and 323


of this title.



Req. No. 117 Page 5


2. This The provisions of this section shall not prevent resort


to other means of review, redress, relief, or trial de novo, that


are available because of constitutional provisions.


3. Neither a motion for new trial nor an application for


rehearing shall be prerequisite to secure judicial review.


B. 1. The judicial review prescribed by this section for final


agency orders, as to agencies whose final agency orders are made


subject to review, under constitutional or statutory provisions, by


appellate proceedings in the Supreme Court of Oklahoma, shall be


afforded by such proceedings taken in accordance with the procedure


and under the conditions otherwise provided by law, but subject to


the applicable provisions of Sections 319 through 324 of this title,


and the rules of the Supreme Court.


2. In all other instances, proceedings for review shall be


instituted by filing a petition, in the district court of the county


in which the party seeking review resides or at the option of such


party where the property interest affected is situated, naming as


respondents only the agency, such other party or parties in the


administrative proceeding as may be named by the petitioner or as


otherwise may be allowed by law, within thirty (30) days after the


appellant is notified of the final agency order as provided in


Section 312 of this title.


C. Copies of the petition shall be delivered in person or


mailed, postage prepaid, to the agency and all other parties of

Req. No. 117 Page 6


record, and proof of such delivery or mailing shall be filed in the


court within ten (10) days after the filing of the petition. Any


party not named as a respondent in the petition is entitled to


respond within ten (10) days of receipt of service. The court, in


its discretion, may permit other interested persons to intervene.


D. In any proceedings for review brought by a party aggrieved


by a final agency order:


1. The agency whose final agency order was made subject to


review may be entitled to recover against such aggrieved party any


court costs, witness fees and reasonable attorney fees if the court


determines that the proceeding brought by the party is frivolous or


was brought to delay the effect of said final agency order.


2. The party aggrieved by the final agency order may be


entitled to recover against such agency any court costs, witness


fees, and reasonable treble attorney fees if the court determines


that the proceeding brought by the agency is frivolous.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 75 O.S. 2021, Section 320, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 320. Within sixty (60) days after service of the


petition for review or equivalent process upon it, or within such


further time as the reviewing court, upon application for good cause


shown, may allow, the agency shall transmit to the reviewing court


the original or a certified copy of the entire record of the


proceeding under review. For purposes of this section, “record”

Req. No. 117 Page 7


shall include such information as specified by Section 309 of this


title. By stipulation of all parties to the review proceeding, the


record may be shortened. Any party unreasonably refusing to


stipulate to limit the record may be taxed by the court for the


additional costs resulting therefrom. The court may require or


permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record when deemed


desirable. If the agency does not timely transmit an original or


certified copy of the entire record of the proceeding under review,


it shall be liable for treble attorney fees of any party seeking the


filing of such record.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 7. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-117 TEK 1/19/2025 5:38:23 AM















Req. No. 117 Page 8